Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 2. Fees.

§ 13.1-615.
Fees to be collected by Commission; application of payment; payment of fees prerequisite to Commission action; exceptions.

The Commission shall assess the registration fees and shall charge and collect the filing fees, charter fees, and entrance fees imposed by law. The Commission shall have authority to certify to the Comptroller directing refund of any overpayment of a fee, or of any fee collected for a document that is not accepted for filing, at any time within one year from the date of its payment. When the Commission receives payment of an annual registration fee assessed against a domestic or foreign corporation, such payment shall be applied against any unpaid annual registration fees previously assessed against such corporation, including any penalties incurred thereon, beginning with the assessment or penalty that has remained unpaid for the longest period of time.

The Commission shall not file or issue with respect to any domestic or foreign corporation any document or certificate specified in this chapter, except the annual report required by §

13.1-775

, a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-635

or

13.1-764

, and a statement of resignation pursuant to §

13.1-636

or

13.1-765

, until all fees, fines, penalties, and interest assessed, imposed, charged, or to be collected by the Commission pursuant to this chapter or Title 12.1 have been paid by or on behalf of such corporation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Commission may file or issue any document or certificate with respect to a domestic or foreign corporation that has been assessed an annual registration fee if the document or certificate is filed or issued with an effective date that is on or before the due date of the corporation’s annual registration fee payment in any year, provided that the Commission shall not issue a certificate of domestication with respect to a foreign corporation, a certificate of conversion with respect to a foreign eligible entity, or a certificate of conversion with respect to a domestic corporation that will become a domestic eligible entity until the annual registration fee has been paid by or on behalf of that corporation or eligible entity.

A domestic or foreign corporation shall not be required to pay the annual registration fee assessed against it pursuant to subsection B of §

13.1-775.1

in any year if (i) the Commission issues or files any of the following types of certificate or instrument and (ii) the certificate or instrument is effective on or before the annual registration fee due date:

A certificate of termination of corporate existence, a certificate of domestication for a domestic corporation, or a certificate of conversion for a domestic corporation that will become a foreign eligible entity;

A certificate of withdrawal for a foreign corporation;

A certificate of merger or an authenticated copy of an instrument of merger for a domestic or foreign corporation that has merged into a surviving domestic corporation or eligible entity or into a surviving foreign corporation or eligible entity; or

An authenticated copy of an instrument of conversion for a foreign corporation that has converted to a different entity type.The Commission shall cancel the annual registration fee assessments specified in this subsection that remain unpaid.

A foreign corporation that has amended its articles of incorporation to reduce the number of shares it is authorized to issue, effective prior to its annual registration fee assessment date pursuant to subsection B of §

13.1-775.1

of a given year, and has timely filed an authenticated copy of the amendment with the Commission pursuant to §

13.1-760

after its annual registration fee assessment date pursuant to subsection B of §

13.1-775.1

shall have its annual registration fee reassessed to reflect the new number of authorized shares.

Annual registration fee assessments that have been paid shall not be refunded.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-122; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1988, c. 405; 1989, c. 152; 1991, c. 309; 1997, c. 216; 2001, c. 545; 2002, c. 1; 2005, c. 765; 2006, c. 659; 2007, c. 810; 2009, c. 216; 2010, c. 753; 2015, c. 623; 2019, c. 734; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) amending and reenacting §§

13.1-615

,

13.1-615.1

,

13.1-616

,

13.1-632

,

13.1-721.1

, and

13.1-722.2

through

13.1-722.13

of the Code of Virginia; (ii) amending the Code of Virginia by adding in Chapter 9 of Title 13.1 an article numbered 1.1, consisting of sections numbered

13.1-614.1

through

13.1-614.8

, and by adding sections numbered

13.1-712.1

,

13.1-722.1:1

,

13.1-722.7:1

, and

13.1-722.12:1

; and (iii) repealing §§

13.1-722.4

,

13.1-722.7

, and

13.1-722.14

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 1997 amendment,

effective January 1, 1998, in the last paragraph, substituted “its annual report due date pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-775

” for “March 15 ” in two places and substituted “its annual assessment date pursuant to subsection B of §

13.1-775.1

” for “January 1 ” in two places.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 545, effective February 1, 2002, in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection B, substituted “that has ceased” for “which has ceased,” inserted “in this Commonwealth” and “certificate of incorporation surrender or certificate of entity conversion.” See Editor’s note.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection B, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth,” and “that has” for “which has” three times.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 659, in subsection B, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “file or issue with respect to any domestic or foreign corporation” for “issue any certificate or file,” inserted “or certificate” and “a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-635

or

13.1-764

, and a statement of resignation pursuant to §

13.1-636

or

13.1-765

,” and inserted “by or on behalf of such corporation” at the end, deleted the former second sentence, which read:
“However, a certificate of termination of corporate existence may be issued under the provisions of §

13.1-751

without requiring prepayment of any such assessment” and added the present second sentence, and substituted “a certificate of termination of corporate existence pursuant to §

13.1-751

” for “such a certificate” in the last sentence, and substituted “canceling” for “cancelling” in the third sentence of the last paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 810, in subsection B, substituted “on or before” for “prior to” and inserted the proviso at the end of the second sentence; and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Except as provided hereinafter, the issuance of a certificate of termination of corporate existence pursuant to §

13.1-751

shall not have the effect of releasing any obligation that has accrued in favor of the Commonwealth on account of such assessment”; inserted designators for subsections C through E; in subsection C, substituted “on or before” for “prior to” in the first and second sentences and substituted “cancel” for “enter an order withdrawing and canceling” and “subsection” for “section” in the third sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 216, in subsection C, substituted “an authenticated copy of the instrument of merger” for “the certificate of merger” in the second sentence and inserted the third sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 753 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 inserted “annual” preceding “report” in subsection B; rewrote subsection C; in subsection D, substituted “A” for “Any” at the beginning, twice inserted “registration fee” before “assessment date” and inserted “annual” preceding “registration fee reassessed”; and substituted “Annual registration fee” for “Registration fee” in subsection E.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivisions C 1 and 4, deleted “entity” preceding “conversion.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection B, inserted “a certificate of conversion with respect to a foreign eligible entity, or a certificate of conversion with respect to a domestic corporation that will become a domestic eligible entity” and added “or eligible entity”; and in subdivision C 1, substituted “domestication for a domestic corporation” for “incorporation surrender” and added “that will become a foreign eligible entity.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

§ 13.1-615.1.
Charter and entrance fees for corporations.

Every domestic corporation, upon the granting of its charter or upon its incorporation by domestication or conversion, shall pay a charter fee into the state treasury, and every foreign corporation, when it obtains from the State Corporation Commission a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth, shall pay an entrance fee into the state treasury. The fee in each case is to be ascertained and fixed as follows:For any domestic or foreign corporation whose number of authorized shares is 1,000,000 or fewer shares: $50 for each 25,000 shares or fraction thereof;For any domestic or foreign corporation whose number of authorized shares is more than 1,000,000 shares: $2,500.

For any foreign corporation that files articles of domestication and that had authority to transact business in the Commonwealth at the time of such filing, the charter fee to be charged upon domestication shall be an amount equal to the difference between the amount that would be required by this section and the amount already paid as an entrance fee by such corporation.

Whenever by articles of amendment, articles of merger, articles of correction, or articles of ratification, the number of authorized shares of any domestic or foreign corporation or of the surviving corporation is increased, the charter or entrance fee to be charged shall be an amount equal to the difference between the amount already paid as a charter or entrance fee by such corporation and the amount that would be required by this section to be paid if the increased number of authorized shares were being stated at that time in the original articles of incorporation.

For any domestic nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or partnership that files articles of conversion to become a domestic corporation and that had previously converted from a domestic corporation, the charter fee to be charged upon conversion shall be an amount equal to the difference between the amount that would be required by this section and the amount already paid as a charter fee by the domestic nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or partnership when it was a domestic corporation.

For any domestic nonstock corporation that files articles of conversion to become a domestic corporation and that was not previously incorporated as a domestic corporation, the charter fee to be charged shall be an amount equal to the difference between the amount already paid as a charter fee by the domestic nonstock corporation upon its incorporation and the amount that would be required by this section to be paid in accordance with the number of authorized shares in the corporation’s amended and restated articles of incorporation.

If no charter or entrance fee has been heretofore paid to the Commonwealth, the amount to be paid shall be the same as would have to be paid on original incorporation or application for authority to transact business.

History.

1988, c. 405; 2001, c. 545; 2002, c. 1; 2007, c. 810; 2008, c. 509; 2015, c. 623; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) amending and reenacting §§

13.1-615

,

13.1-615.1

,

13.1-616

,

13.1-632

,

13.1-721.1

, and

13.1-722.2

through

13.1-722.13

of the Code of Virginia; (ii) amending the Code of Virginia by adding in Chapter 9 of Title 13.1 an article numbered 1.1, consisting of sections numbered

13.1-614.1

through

13.1-614.8

, and by adding sections numbered

13.1-712.1

,

13.1-722.1:1

,

13.1-722.7:1

, and

13.1-722.12:1

; and (iii) repealing §§

13.1-722.4

,

13.1-722.7

, and

13.1-722.14

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, effective July 1, 2021, in the first paragraph of subsection A, substituted “upon its incorporation by domestication or conversion” for “upon domestication”; in subsection E, deleted “entity” preceding “conversion” twice; added subsection F; and redesignated former subsection F as G.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “articles of merger articles of correction, or articles of ratification,” for “or, articles of merger” in subsection D.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, deleted former subsection C, which read: “For any foreign corporation that files an application for a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth and that had previously surrendered its articles of incorporation as a domestic corporation, the entrance fee to be charged upon obtaining a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth shall be an amount equal to the difference between the amount that would be required by this section and the amount already paid as a charter fee by such corporation” and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in subsection D, inserted twice both “nonstock corporation” and “business trust, limited partnership, or partnership”; and in subsection E, substituted “conversion” for “restatement” and inserted “and that was not previously incorporated as a domestic corporation.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-616.
Fees for filing documents or issuing certificates.

The Commission shall charge and collect the following fees, except as provided in §

12.1-21.2

:

For filing of articles of conversion to convert a corporation to an eligible entity, the fee shall be $100.

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $25:

Articles of incorporation or domestication.

Articles of conversion to convert an eligible entity to a corporation.

Articles of amendment or restatement.

Articles of merger or share exchange.

Articles of correction.

Articles of ratification.

An application of a foreign corporation for a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

An application of a foreign corporation for an amended certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

A copy of an amendment of the articles of incorporation of a foreign corporation holding a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

A copy of articles of merger of a foreign corporation holding a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

A copy of an instrument of conversion of a foreign corporation holding a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

An application to register or to renew the registration of a corporate name.

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $10:

For issuing a certificate pursuant to §

13.1-781

, the fee shall be $6.

a.

An application to reserve or to renew the reservation of a corporate name.

b.

A notice of transfer of a reserved corporate name.

c.

An application for use of an indistinguishable name.

d.

Articles of dissolution.

e.

Articles of revocation of dissolution.

f.

Articles of termination of corporate existence.

g.

An application for a certificate of withdrawal of a foreign corporation.

h.

A notice of release of a registered name.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-18, 13.1-123, 13.1-124.1; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1964, c. 551; 1972, c. 579; 1975, c. 500; 1981, c. 522; 1982, c. 460; 1984, c. 294; 1985, c. 522; 1988, c. 405; 1995, c. 368; 2001, c. 545; 2002, c. 1; 2004, c. 274; 2005, c. 765; 2007, cc. 771, 810; 2012, c. 130; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) amending and reenacting §§

13.1-615

,

13.1-615.1

,

13.1-616

,

13.1-632

,

13.1-721.1

, and

13.1-722.2

through

13.1-722.13

of the Code of Virginia; (ii) amending the Code of Virginia by adding in Chapter 9 of Title 13.1 an article numbered 1.1, consisting of sections numbered

13.1-614.1

through

13.1-614.8

, and by adding sections numbered

13.1-712.1

,

13.1-722.1:1

,

13.1-722.7:1

, and

13.1-722.12:1

; and (iii) repealing §§

13.1-722.4

,

13.1-722.7

, and

13.1-722.14

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 545, effective February 1, 2002, inserted “except as provided in §

12.1-21.2

” in the introductory sentence and inserted “domestication, entity conversion or incorporation surrender” in subdivision A 1. See Editor’s note.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274, in subsection A, substituted “$25” for “twenty-five dollars” in the introductory paragraph and added subdivision A 9; substituted “$10” for “ten dollars” in subsection B; substituted “$5” for “five dollars” in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 inserted “or to renew the reservation of” in subdivision B 1.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 771 redesignated subdivisions and substituted “pursuant to §

13.1-781

, the fee shall be $6” for “of change of name, the fee shall be $5” in subdivision 3.

The 2007 amendment by c. 810 designated former subsections A through C as present subdivisions 1 through 3; in subdivision 1, deleted “entity conversion” preceding “or incorporation surrender” near the end; added present subdivision 1 b; and redesignated former subdivisions 1 b through 1 i as present subdivisions 1 c through 1 j.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130 substituted “An application for a certificate” for “A statement” at the beginning of subdivision 2 g.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, effective July 1, 2021, added subdivision 1; redesignated former subdivisions 1 through 3 as 2 through 4; in subdivision 2 a., deleted “or incorporation surrender” at the end; in subdivisions 2 b. and 2 j., deleted “entity” preceding “conversion”; in subdivision 2 b., substituted “an eligible entity” for “a domestic limited liability company”; added subdivisions 2 k. and 3 h.; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, inserted subdivision 2 f, and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

§ 13.1-617.
Repealed by Acts 2001, c. 545, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2002, c. 1, effective February 1, 2002.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 545, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2002, c. 1, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on February 1, 2002; however, no domestication pursuant to Article 12.1 (§

13.1-722.2

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 13.1 shall occur prior to July 1, 2002, and no conversion pursuant to Article 12.2 (§

13.1-722.8

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 13.1 shall occur prior to July 1, 2002, unless the converting entity is (i) a domestic corporation incorporated before July 1, 1970, and (ii) the corporation is authorized to issue 5,000 shares or more.”

Former §

13.1-617

, relating to miscellaneous charges, was derived from Code 1950, §§ 13-18, 13.1-124; 1956, c. 428; 1964, c. 551; 1970, c. 3; 1982, c. 460; 1984, c. 771; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 622; 1989, c. 152; 1991, c. 123; 1992, c. 377.